Louisiana, session 2026, SB429.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:851.20(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§851.20. Identification number
* * *
C.(1) Should the ownership of a motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat change,
a new application form with a five dollar fee shall be filed with the commission,
along with the registration fee required by this Section, and a new certificate of
number and a decal, valid for three years, shall be awarded in the same manner as
provided for in an original award of number.
(2)(a) An application for a certificate of number may be filed by the
possessor of a motorboat, houseboat, or sailboat with a certificate of number
that has lapsed for at least five years. The possessor shall submit an affidavit
stating the following:
(i) Notice of the application has been provided by certified mail, return
receipt requested, to the last holder of a certificate of number.
(ii) The applicant has been in possession of the boat for at least one year
immediately preceding the date of application.
(b) Copies of the notice and return receipt shall be submitted to the
commission with the affidavit.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 429 ENROLLED
(c) All documentation submitted to the commission pursuant to this
Paragraph shall be in a form prescribed by the commission.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.